California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) In consultation with the hospital community, as defined in Section 14169.51, the department shall develop proposed modifications to the quality assurance fee program under Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50) to collect additional fees solely designated for use under this section. In addition, the department shall consult with the hospital community to enable intergovernmental transfers from nondesignated public hospitals solely designated for use under this section. The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and fiscal and appropriate policy committees 30 working days prior to implementing a modification pursuant to this section.

(b) To the extent federal
 financial participation is not jeopardized and consistent with federal law, and subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (c), the department shall pay Medi-Cal managed care plans rate range increases, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14301.4, for the purpose of increasing payments to private hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals in counties that do not have designated public hospitals. Nondesignated public hospitals shall be given priority relative to accessing rate range funds in counties where a nondesignated public hospital is the only public hospital.

(c) Payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to subdivision (b) are conditioned on both of the following:

(A) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall pay all of the rate range increases provided under this section as additional payments to private hospitals and nondesignated public
 hospitals for providing and making available services to Medi-Cal enrollees of the plan.

(B) The amount of the increases to Medi-Cal managed care plans shall be limited to the total amount of payments possible, including federal financial participation, based on the amount of fees actually collected and intergovernmental transfers actually provided pursuant to subdivision (a) as the nonfederal share for these payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 7.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.83.

To the extent permitted by federal law and other federal requirements, the director shall develop and describe in provider bulletins and on the department’s Internet Web site a process by which a private general acute care hospital located outside the state that serves Medi-Cal beneficiaries may opt in to pay the quality assurance fee on all applicable categories of patient days and receive supplemental payments for the Medi-Cal program patient days pursuant to Article 5.230 (commencing with Section 14169.50), in the same manner that the hospital could participate if it were located in the state. Notwithstanding Section 14169.51, the department shall rely on reliable data to make reasonable estimates or projections made with respect to the hospital as to the data, including, but not
 limited to, the days data source, used for the following: acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days, used to calculate the fees due and the supplemental payments. The director may modify the procedure set forth in this section to the minimum extent necessary to comply with applicable law, in consultation with the hospital community as defined in Section 14169.51.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 7.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.3. Audit, Appeal, and Recovery of Overpayments [14170. - 14178.]

14170.

(a) (1) Amounts paid for services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be audited by the department in the manner and form prescribed by the department. The department shall maintain adequate controls to ensure responsibility and accountability for the expenditure of federal and state funds. Cost reports and other data submitted by providers to a state agency for the purpose of determining reasonable costs for services or establishing rates of payment shall be considered true and correct unless audited or reviewed
 by the department within 18 months after July 1, 1969, the close of the period covered by the report, or after the date of submission of the original or amended report by the provider, whichever is later. Moreover the cost reports and other data for cost reporting periods beginning on January 1, 1972, and thereafter shall be considered true and correct unless audited or reviewed within three years after the close of the period covered by the report, or after the date of submission of the original or amended report by the provider, whichever is later.

(2) (A) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the correction of cost reports or rates of payment when inaccuracies are determined to be the result of intent to defraud, or when a delay in the completion of an audit is the result of willful acts by the provider or inability to reach agreement on the terms of final settlement.

(B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the department from further review of cost reports and other data for cost reporting periods beginning on January 1, 1998, after the three-year period contained in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), where after the three-year period the department discovers information not customarily contained in these cost reports and other data for the fiscal periods in question that indicates the provider may have engaged in practices that have resulted in overreimbursement.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nursing facilities and all categories of intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled which have received and are receiving funds for salary increases pursuant to Sections 14110.6 and 14110.7 shall maintain payroll and personnel records for examination by auditors from the department and the Labor
 Commissioner beginning March 1985 until the records have been audited, or until December 31, 1992, whichever occurs first.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, costs reported for reimbursement purposes relative to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in nursing facilities that are distinct parts of acute care hospitals shall be audited by the department at least annually. The audits may be performed on a sample basis and, when the sample is statistically reliable, as determined by the department, may be used for ratesetting purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.1.

(a) Prior to the issuance to a provider of pharmaceutical services of any demand for payment pursuant to an audit or examination conducted under Sections 10722 and 14170, the amount of any underpayment to the provider for validly submitted claims or for valid claims which have inadvertently not been submitted and which arose during the audit period shall be determined and credited toward the amount of any overpayment due to the department. This section shall apply to all audits and examinations conducted under Sections 10722 and 14170 relative to amounts paid during the audit period for services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.
 No audit may be reopened to provide for underpayments in which a final decision has been reached pursuant to Section 14171 or in which a certificate has been filed pursuant to Section 14172.

(b) When a provider of pharmaceutical services asserts that a claim has been underpaid for purposes of receiving a credit against overpayments, as authorized by this section, the provider shall submit to the department information and documentation sufficient to resolve any dispute as to whether such claim was in fact underpaid.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “underpayments” shall include errors made by the pharmacist and errors made by the fiscal intermediary in determining payments for claims submitted within the billing time limits specified in Section 14115.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.5.

(a) No provider’s claims for reimbursement under this chapter shall be subject to any special claims review procedure for a period in excess of nine months unless the department shows cause why the provider’s claims for reimbursement should continue to be subject to special claims review procedures.

(b) The department shall provide notice to a provider of its reasons for determining that the provider shall be subject to extended special claims review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every primary supplier of pharmaceuticals, medical equipment, or supplies shall maintain accounting records to demonstrate the manufacture, assembly, purchase, or acquisition and subsequent sale, of any pharmaceuticals, or medical equipment, or supplies to providers, as defined in Section 14043.1. Accounting records shall include, but not be limited to, inventory records, general ledgers, financial statements, purchase and sales journals and invoices, prescription records, bills of lading, and delivery records. For purposes of this section the term “primary suppliers” shall mean any manufacturer, principal labeler, assembler, wholesaler, or retailer.

(b) Accounting records
 maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to audit or examination by the department or its agents. This audit or examination may include, but is not limited to, verification of what was claimed by the provider. These accounting records shall be maintained for 10 years from the date of sale or the date of service.

(c) This section shall not apply to any clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or to any manufacturer of prescription drugs registered with the federal Food and Drug Administration in accordance with Section 510 of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 125.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.10.

(a) No provider shall submit a claim to the department or its fiscal intermediaries for the dispensing or furnishing of a controlled drug, a dangerous drug, or a dangerous device, or a drug or device requiring a written order or prescription for the drug or device to be covered under the Medi-Cal program or for the performance of a clinical laboratory test or examination, unless the provider’s records contain an order authorized by Section 4019 of the Business and Professions Code, or a prescription, including an electronic transmission
 prescription, signed by the person lawfully authorized by his or her practice act to prescribe or order the dispensing or furnishing of that drug or device to, or for the performance of a clinical laboratory test or examination that meets the federal CLIA standard for test requisition as set forth in Section 493.1241 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations upon, a Medi-Cal beneficiary, except the following:

(1) Providers who are physicians, clinics, hospitals, or other nonpharmacists and who are legally authorized to dispense or furnish drugs or devices directly to their patients, may in lieu of the requirements of this subdivision include a notation in their patients’ medical charts reflecting they have dispensed or furnished the drug or device directly to the patient as authorized by the Business and Professions Code.

(2) Anatomical pathology examinations may be ordered
 by physicians by notation within the patients medical record during inpatient or outpatient surgery provided that these examinations comply with federal CLIA requirements. Any claims made contrary to this section shall be subject to recovery as overpayments.

(3) If obtaining a biological specimen is required in order that a test or examination occurs on a periodic basis within an established provider-patient relationship or the furnishing or dispensing of drugs or devices occurs on a periodic basis within an established provider-patient relationship, the provider shall only be required to retain the order or requisition upon obtaining the biological specimen necessary for the initial test or examination or initial furnishing or dispensing of the drug or device, so long as an appropriate record of each test or examination, or furnishing or dispensing, is entered in the patient’s chart.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Signed” shall include a signature that meets the conditions of the Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001).

(2) “Controlled substance” shall mean any substance listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Dangerous drug” or “dangerous device” has the same meaning as in Section 4022 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Drug or device” means:

(A) “Drug,” as defined in Section 4025 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) “Device,” as defined in Section 4023 of the Business
 and Professions Code.

(C) Pharmaceuticals, medical equipment, medical supplies, orthotics and prosthetics appliances, and other product-like supplies or equipment.

(5) “Prescription” has the same meaning as in Section 4040 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) “Electronic transmission prescription” includes both image and data prescriptions.

(7) “Electronic image transmission prescription” means any prescription order for which a facsimile of the order is received by a pharmacy or other appropriate provider from a licensed prescriber and that is reduced to writing and processed by the pharmacy or other appropriate provider in accordance with applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code, including Section 4070.

(8) “Electronic data transmission prescription” means any prescription order, other than an electronic image transmission prescription, that is electronically transmitted from a licensed prescriber to a pharmacy or other appropriate provider and which is reduced to writing and processed by the pharmacy or other appropriate provider in accordance with applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code, including Section 4070. The use of commonly used abbreviations shall not invalidate an otherwise valid prescription.

(9) “Clinical laboratory test or examination” means the detection, identification, measurement, evaluation, correlation, monitoring, and reporting of any particular analyte, entity, or substance within a biological specimen for the purpose of obtaining scientific data that may be used as an aid to ascertain the presence, progress, and source of a disease or
 physiological condition in a human being, or used as an aid in the prevention, prognosis, monitoring, or treatment of a physiological or pathological condition in a human being, or for the performance of nondiagnostic tests for assessing the health of an individual.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction. The department shall notify and consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing, interpreting, or making specific the provisions of this section, including all of the following:

(1) Notifying provider representatives of the proposed action or change. The notice shall occur
 at least 10 business days prior to the meeting provided for in paragraph (2).

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders to discuss the action or change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the action or change.

(4) Providing at least 30 days’ advance notice on the effective date of the action or change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 601, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.11.

(a) No person or entity shall submit a claim to the department or its fiscal intermediaries for reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program for a nerve conduction test or for electromyography unless the person or entity’s records contains a copy, for each person performing each test or electromyography, for which a claim is submitted, a certificate or diploma of satisfactory completion of a neurology or physical medicine and rehabilitation residency program accredited by the Accreditation Council of Graduate Medical Education (ACGME).

(b) The department may identify by publication, in provider bulletins or similar instructions, requirements that reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program shall only be made for the provision of certain procedures, tests, examinations, or other medical services provided by persons who possess a particular level of education, experience, and training as evidenced by satisfactory completion of medical residency programs or board certification in a particular field and that those submitting claims shall maintain a copy of this certificate or diploma.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific, this section by means of all county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations in accordance with the
 requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 25.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14170.12.

Effective January 1, 2012, and notwithstanding Section 19130 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into contracts with one or more eligible Medicaid Recovery Audit Contractors (RACs) pursuant to Section 1396a(a)(42)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 797, Sec. 26.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14171.

(a) The director shall establish administrative appeal processes to review grievances or complaints arising from the findings of an audit or examination made pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170 and for final settlements, including, in the case of hospitals, the application of Sections 51536, 51537, and 51539 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. All these processes shall be established by
 regulation, pursuant to, and consistent with, Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Different administrative appeal processes may be established by the director for grievances or complaints arising from the determinations of a tentative or final settlement based on audit or examination findings made by or on behalf of the department pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170. However, consistent with existing practice, no administrative appeal shall be available for tentative settlement of cost reports.

(c) The administrative appeal process established by the director for tentative settlements, including, in the case of hospitals, the application of Sections 51536, 51537, and 51539 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations shall be an informal process which, however, guarantees a provider the right to present any grievance or complaint to the department in writing.
 Any subsequent hearings shall be conducted in an informal manner and shall be held at the discretion of the department.

(d) The time limitations in subdivisions (e) and (f) for the impartial hearing and the final decisions are mandatory. If the department fails to conduct the hearing or to adopt a final decision thereon within the time limitations provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), the amount of any overpayment which is ultimately determined by the department to be due shall be reduced by 10 percent for each 30-day period, or portion thereof, that the hearing or the decision, or both, are delayed beyond the time limitations provided in subdivisions (e) and (f). However, the time period shall be extended by either of the following:

(1) Delay caused by a provider.

(2) Extensions of time granted a provider at its
 sole request or at the joint request of the provider and the department.

(e) (1) The administrative appeal process established by the director shall commence with an informal conference with the provider, a representative of the department, and the administrative law judge. The informal conference shall be conducted no later than 90 days after the filing of a timely and specific statement of disputed issues by the provider. The administrative law judge, when appropriate, may assign the administrative appeal to an informal level of review where efforts could be made to resolve facts and issues in dispute in a fair and equitable manner, subject to the requirements of state and federal law. The review conducted at this informal level shall be completed no later than 180 days after the filing of a timely and specific statement of disputed issues by the provider.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the provider from presenting any unresolved grievances or complaints at an impartial hearing pursuant to subdivision (a). The impartial hearing shall be conducted no later than 300 days after the filing of a timely and specific statement of disputed issues by the provider.

(3) (A) Subject to subdivision (f), a final decision in a noninstitutional provider appeal shall be adopted within 180 days after the closure of the record of the impartial hearing, and a final decision in an institutional provider appeal shall be adopted within 300 days after the closure of the record of the impartial hearing.

(B) The department shall mail a copy of the adopted decision to all parties within 30 days of the date of adoption of the decision.

(f) In the
 event the director intends to modify a proposed decision, on or before the 180th day following the closure of the record of the hearing for noninstitutional providers or the 300th day following the closure of the record of the hearing for institutional providers, the director shall provide written notice of his or her intention to the parties and shall afford the parties an opportunity to present written argument. Following this notice, on or before the 240th day following the closure of the record of the hearing for noninstitutional providers or the 420th day following closure of the record of the hearing for institutional providers, or within that additional time period as is granted pursuant to the sole request of a provider or at the joint request of the provider and the department, the director shall issue a final decision.

(g) In the event recovery of a disallowed payment has been made by the department, a provider who prevails in an
 appeal of a disallowed payment shall be entitled to interest at the rate equal to the monthly average received on investments in the Surplus Money Investment Fund, or simple interest at the rate of 7 percent per annum, whichever is higher, commencing on the date the appeal is formally accepted by the department or the date payment is received by the department, whichever is later.

(h) Except as provided in subdivision (i), commencing 60 days after issuance of the first statement of account status or demand for repayment resulting from an audit or examination made pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170, interest at the rate equal to the monthly average received on investments in the Surplus Money Investment Fund during the month the first statement of account status or demand for repayment was issued, or simple interest at the rate of 7 percent per annum, whichever is higher, shall be assessed against any unrecovered overpayment due to the
 department.

(i) (1) Commencing on the day following the last day of the period covered by an audit or examination made pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170, interest at the rate established under Section 19269 of the Revenue and Taxation Code which is in effect on the date of the commencement of that interest shall be assessed against any unrecovered overpayment due to the department by providers of durable medical equipment or incontinence supplies.

(2) Interest which accrues under this subdivision for recoupment of an overpayment based on the lack of medical necessity for a previously approved claim shall commence to accrue on the date of written demand by the department.

(j) The final decision of the director shall be reviewable in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure
 within six months of the issuance of the director’s final decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 108.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14171.5.

Any institutional provider of health care services that obtained reimbursement under this chapter to which it is not entitled shall be subject to the following interest charges or penalties:

(a) When it is established upon audit that the provider has claimed payments under this chapter to which it is not entitled, the provider shall pay, in addition to the amount improperly received, interest at the rate specified by subdivision (h) of Section 14171.

(b) When it is established upon audit that the provider claimed payments related to services or costs that the department had previously notified the provider in an audit report that the costs
 or services were not reimbursable, the provider shall pay in addition to the amount improperly claimed, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount improperly claimed after this notice, plus the cost of the audit. In addition, interest shall be assessed at the rate specified in subdivision (h) of Section 14171. Providers who wish to preserve appeal rights or to challenge the department’s positions regarding appeal issues, may claim the cost or services and not be reimbursed therefor if they are identified and presented separately on the cost report.

(c) When it is established that the provider fraudulently claimed and received payments under this chapter, the provider shall pay a penalty of 25 percent of the amount improperly claimed, plus the cost of the audit, in addition to the amount thereof. In addition, interest will be assessed at the rate specified by subdivision (h) of Section 14171. A fraudulent claim is a claim upon which the provider has
 been convicted of fraud upon the program. Nothing in this section shall prevent the imposition of any other civil or criminal penalties to which the provider may be liable.

(d) Appeals to action taken in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 14171.5 above are subject to the administrative appeals process provided by Section 14171.

(e) Penalties paid by providers under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 14171.5 are not reimbursable by the program.

(f) As used in this section, “the cost of the audit” includes actual hourly wages, travel, and incidental expenses at rates allowable by Department of General Services rules, and applicable overhead costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 283.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14171.6.

(a) (1) Any provider, as defined in paragraph (3), that obtains reimbursement under this chapter to which it is not entitled shall be subject to interest charges or penalties as specified in this section.

(2) When it is established upon audit that the provider has not received reimbursement to which the provider is entitled, the department shall pay the provider interest assessed at the rate, and in the manner, specified in subdivision (g) of Section 14171.

(3) For purposes of this section, “provider” means any provider, as defined in Section 14043.1.

(b) When it is established upon audit that the provider has claimed payments under this chapter to which it is not entitled, the provider shall pay, in addition to the amount improperly received, interest at the rate specified by subdivision (h) of Section 14171.

(c) (1) When it is established upon audit that the provider claimed payments related to services or costs that the department had previously notified the provider in an audit report that the costs or services were not reimbursable, the provider shall pay, in addition to the amount improperly claimed, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount improperly claimed after receipt of the notice, plus the cost of the audit.

(2) In addition to the penalty and costs specified by paragraph (1), interest shall be assessed at the rate specified in subdivision
 (h) of Section 14171.

(3) Providers that wish to preserve appeal rights or to challenge the department’s positions regarding appeal issues may claim the costs or services and not be reimbursed therefor if they are identified and presented separately on the cost report.

(d) (1) When it is established that the provider fraudulently claimed and received payments under this chapter, the provider shall pay, in addition to that portion of the claim that was improperly claimed, a penalty of 300 percent of the amount improperly claimed, plus the cost of the audit.

(2) In addition to the penalty and costs specified by paragraph (1), interest shall be assessed at the rate specified by subdivision (h) of Section 14171.

(3) For purposes of
 this subdivision, a fraudulent claim is a claim upon which the provider has been convicted of fraud upon the Medi-Cal program.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent the imposition of any other civil or criminal penalties to which the provider may be liable.

(f) Any appeal to any action taken pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) is subject to the administrative appeals process provided by Section 14171.

(g) As used in this section, “cost of the audit” includes actual hourly wages, travel, and incidental expenses at rates allowable by rules adopted by the Department of General Services and applicable overhead costs that are incurred by employees of the state in administering this chapter with respect to the performance of audits.

(h) This section
 shall not apply to any clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, clinics exempt from licensure under Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, health facilities licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or to any provider that is operated by a city, county, or school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 284.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14172.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if any amount is due and payable and unpaid as the result of an overpayment to a provider of health care services, durable medical equipment, or incontinence supplies identified through an audit or examination conducted by or on behalf of the director, and the findings of the audit or examination are completed and no appeal is taken or the director has issued a final decision on the appeal pursuant to Section 14171, and 90 days have elapsed from the completion of that audit or examination or
 issuance of that final decision on appeal, the director may, not later than three years after the payment became due and owing, file in the office of the Clerk of the Superior Court of Sacramento County, and with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the provider has its principal place of business, a certificate containing the following:

(1) Interest, as prescribed by Section 14171. 

(2) A statement that the director has complied with this article prior to the filing of the certificate. 

(3) A request that judgment be entered against the provider in the amount set forth in the certificate.

The clerk immediately upon the filing of the certificate shall enter a judgment for the State of California against the provider in the amount set forth in the
 certificate. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a looseleaf book entitled “Health Care Overpayment Recovery Judgments.”

(b) If the provider seeks judicial review of the final decision of the director pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 14171 and notice of that action is properly served on the director within 90 days of the issuance of the final decision of the director, the director shall not file any certificate as provided in subdivision (a). 

If the provider does not seek judicial review of the final decision of the director pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 14171 and does not properly serve notice within 90 days from the date of the final decision of the director, the director may file the certificate provided in subdivision (a). If the provider seeks judicial review of the final decision of the director more than 90 days from the date of the decision in accordance with subdivision
 (k) of Section 14171, the director shall within 10 days after receiving notice of that action release any lien imposed pursuant to this article and any judgment entered is for all purposes null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 333.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14172.5.

(a) No later than 60 days after the completion of an audit or examination pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170, the department shall issue the first statement of account status or demand for repayment.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 14172 or any other law, when it is established that an overpayment has been made to a provider or a civil money penalty assessed pursuant to Section 14123.2, 14123.25, 14171.5, or 14171.6 is due from a
 provider, the department shall not begin liquidation of the overpayment until 60 days after issuance of the first statement of accountability or demand for repayment after issuance of the audit or examination report establishing the overpayment or the document establishing the penalty. The department shall pursue liquidation of the overpayment or penalty upon expiration of the 60-day period. If the department finds, upon appeal, that no overpayment was made to, or no penalty is due from, the provider, the department shall repay the amount collected, together with the payment of interest thereon, from the date occurring 60 days after issuance of the first statement of accountability or demand for repayment after issuance of the audit or examination report alleging the overpayment or the document establishing the penalty.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed so as to affect the department’s authority under other provisions of law for
 liquidation of overpayments to providers.

(c) Liquidation of the overpayment or penalty may be by any of the following:

(1) Lump-sum payment by the provider.

(2) Offset against current payments due to the provider.

(3) A repayment agreement executed between the provider and the department.

(4) Any other method of recovery available to and deemed appropriate by the director.

(d) An offset against current payments shall continue until one of the following occurs:

(1) The overpayment or penalty is recovered.

(2) The department enters into an agreement with the provider for repayment of the overpayment or penalty.

(3) The department determines, upon appeal, that there is no overpayment or that the penalty should not have been assessed.

(e) The provider shall pay interest on any unrecovered overpayments or penalty assessments as provided by subdivision (h) of Section 14171. If recovery of a disallowed payment has been made by the department, a provider who prevails in an appeal of a disallowed payment or penalty assessment shall be paid interest as provided by subdivision (g) of Section 14171.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider from repaying all or a part of the disputed overpayment or penalty assessment without prejudice to the provider’s right
 to a hearing pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14171 or pursuant to Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) If a provider appeals the assessment of a civil money penalty, liquidation of the penalty shall be deferred until the appeal is rejected or a final administrative decision is issued.

(h) If on the basis of reliable evidence, the department has a valid basis for believing that, with respect to a provider, proceedings have been or will shortly be instituted in a state or federal court for purposes of determining whether the provider is insolvent or bankrupt under appropriate state or federal law, or that a provider is or will shortly be taking action which reasonably might seriously hinder or defeat the department’s ability to collect overpayments in the future, the department may immediately adjust any payments to the provider to a level necessary to insure
 that no overpayment to the provider is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 601, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14173.

An abstract of a judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14172 or a copy thereof may be recorded with the county recorder of any county. From the time of recording, the judgment shall constitute a lien upon all real or personal property of the provider in that county owned by the provider at the time, or which the provider may afterwards but before the lien expires, acquire. The lien shall have the force, effect and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of recording of the abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14172 unless sooner released or
 otherwise discharged.

The lien may, within 10 years from the date of recording of the abstract of judgment or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county. From the date of such recording the lien shall be extended for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

Execution shall issue upon such a judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments. Sale shall be held under such execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section, the director or his authorized agents may act on behalf of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 43.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14174.

The right of the director to use the summary judgment procedure contained in this article shall be in addition to any other collection procedure available to him. No action taken by the director shall be construed to be an election to pursue the summary judgment procedure to the exclusion of any other collection procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14175.

The director may release any lien imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14172 if he finds that the liability represented by the lien, including any interest accrued thereon, has been paid or is legally unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14176.
